Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.416

Private carrier bus.

"Private carrier bus" means every motor vehicle designed for the purpose of carrying passengers (having a seating capacity for eleven or more persons) used regularly to transport persons in furtherance of any organized agricultural, religious or charitable purpose. Such term does not include buses operated by common carriers under a franchise granted by any city or town or the Washington public utilities commission.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 100 s 3.]